xall/x60/809689-grammalecte-fr-thunderbird/src/content/dictionaries/fr-FR-classic-reform/fr-FR-classic-reform.aff
FLAG long
SFX d5 Y 114
SFX d5 er er/m'q'd'm't's' er
SFX d5 er ant/m'q'd'm't's' er
SFX d5 eter ette/n'q'j'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter ette/n'q'j'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter ète/n'q'j'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elle/n'q'j'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elle/n'q'j'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èle/n'q'j'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 er è/n'm't' er
SFX d5 eter ettes/n'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter ettes/n'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter ètes/n'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elles/n'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elles/n'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èles/n'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 er ons/n't' er
SFX d5 er ez/n'm' er
SFX d5 eter ettent/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter ettent/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter ètent/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellent/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellent/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èlent/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 er ais/n'j'm't' er
SFX d5 er ait/n'q'm't's' er
SFX d5 er ions/n't' er
SFX d5 er iez/n'm' er
SFX d5 er aient/n'q'm't's' er
SFX d5 er ai/n'j'm't' er
SFX d5 er as/n'm't' er
SFX d5 er a/n'q'm't's' er
SFX d5 er âmes/n't' er
SFX d5 er âtes/n'm' er
SFX d5 er èrent/n'q'm't's' er
SFX d5 eter etterai/n'j'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterai/n'j'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter èterai/n'j'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerai/n'j'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerai/n'j'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èlerai/n'j'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etteras/n'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter etteras/n'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter èteras/n'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elleras/n'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elleras/n'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èleras/n'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter ettera/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter ettera/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter ètera/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellera/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellera/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èlera/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etterons/n't' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterons/n't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter èterons/n't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerons/n't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerons/n't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èlerons/n't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etterez/n'm' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterez/n'm' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter èterez/n'm' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerez/n'm' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerez/n'm' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èlerez/n'm' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etteront/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter etteront/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter èteront/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elleront/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elleront/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èleront/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etterais/n'j'm't' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterais/n'j'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter èterais/n'j'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerais/n'j'm't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerais/n'j'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èlerais/n'j'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etterait/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterait/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter èterait/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerait/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerait/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èlerait/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etterions/n't' jeter
SFX d5 eter etterions/n't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter èterions/n't' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler ellerions/n't' ppeler
SFX d5 eler ellerions/n't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èlerions/n't' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etteriez/n'm' jeter
SFX d5 eter etteriez/n'm' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter èteriez/n'm' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elleriez/n'm' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elleriez/n'm' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èleriez/n'm' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eter etteraient/n'q'm't's' jeter
SFX d5 eter etteraient/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter èteraient/n'q'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elleraient/n'q'm't's' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elleraient/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èleraient/n'q'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d5 er asse/n'j'm't' er
SFX d5 er asses/n'm't' er
SFX d5 er ât/n'q'm't's' er
SFX d5 er assions/n't' er
SFX d5 er assiez/n'm' er
SFX d5 er assent/n'q'm't's' er
SFX d5 eter ette/m' jeter
SFX d5 eter ette/m' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eter ète/m' [^j]eter
SFX d5 eler elle/m' ppeler
SFX d5 eler elle/m' [^p].eler
SFX d5 eler èle/m' [^p].eler
SFX d5 er ons er
SFX d5 er ez er

SFX aA Y 54
SFX aA ller ller/n'q'd'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llant/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llé/q' aller
SFX aA ller llés/q' aller
SFX aA ller llée/q' aller
SFX aA ller llées/q' aller
SFX aA aller vais aller
SFX aA aller vas aller
SFX aA aller va aller
SFX aA ller llons/n'q' aller
SFX aA ller llez/n'q' aller
SFX aA aller vont aller
SFX aA ller llais/n'q'j' aller
SFX aA ller llait/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llions/n'q' aller
SFX aA ller lliez/n'q' aller
SFX aA ller llaient/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llai/n'q'j' aller
SFX aA ller llas/n'q' aller
SFX aA ller lla/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llâmes/n'q' aller
SFX aA ller llâtes/n'q' aller
SFX aA ller llèrent/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA aller irai/n'q'j' aller
SFX aA aller iras/n'q' aller
SFX aA aller ira/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA aller irons/n'q' aller
SFX aA aller irez/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA aller iront/n'q' aller
SFX aA aller irais/n'q'j' aller
SFX aA aller irait/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA aller irions/n'q' aller
SFX aA aller iriez/n'q' aller
SFX aA aller iraient/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA ller ille/n'q'j'm't' aller
SFX aA ller illes/n' aller
SFX aA ller llions/n' aller
SFX aA ller lliez/n' aller
SFX aA ller illent/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llasse/n'q'j' aller
SFX aA ller llasses/n'q' aller
SFX aA ller llât/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llassions/n'q' aller
SFX aA ller llassiez/n'q' aller
SFX aA ller llassent/n'q'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llons/n' aller
SFX aA aller va aller
SFX aA aller vas-y aller
SFX aA aller va-t'en aller
SFX aA ller llons-y aller
SFX aA ller llons-nous-en aller
SFX aA ller llez/n' aller
SFX aA ller llez-y aller
SFX aA ller llez-vous-en aller

SFX aD Y 44
SFX aD voyer voyer/n'q'd'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyant/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyé/q' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyés/q' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyée/q' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyées/q' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voie/n'q'j'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voies/n'q'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyons/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyez/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyais/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyait/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyions/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyiez/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyaient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyai/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyas/n'q'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voya/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyâmes/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyâtes/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyèrent/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrai/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verras/n'q'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verra/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrons/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrez/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verront/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrais/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrait/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verrions/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verriez/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer verraient/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voie/n'q'j'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voies/n'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyasse/n'q'j'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyasses/n'q'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyât/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyassions/n'q'l't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyassiez/n'q'l'm' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyassent/n'q'l'm't's' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voie/n'l'm't' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyons/n'l' envoyer
SFX aD voyer voyez/n'l'm' envoyer

SFX aE Y 6
SFX aE direr direr/n'q'd'l'm't's' direr
SFX aE direr dirant/n'q'l'm't's' direr
SFX aE direr diré/q' direr
SFX aE direr dirés/q' direr
SFX aE direr dirée/q' direr
SFX aE direr dirées/q' direr

SFX aF N 17
SFX aF cerner cernant er
SFX aF cerner cerné er
SFX aF cerner cernés er
SFX aF cerner cernée er
SFX aF cerner cernées er
SFX aF cerner cerne er
SFX aF cerner cernent er
SFX aF cerner cernait er
SFX aF cerner cernaient er
SFX aF cerner cerna er
SFX aF cerner cernèrent er
SFX aF cerner cernera er
SFX aF cerner cerneront er
SFX aF cerner cernerait er
SFX aF cerner cerneraient er
SFX aF cerner cernât er
SFX aF cerner cernassent er
